Maryland, session 2025, SB0492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Maryland Commission to Study the Dental Hygienist Shortage.
(b) The purpose of the Commission is to support the State’s efforts to improve the
oral health of Marylanders by ensuring the stability and sustainability of the State’s dental
hygiene workforce.
(c) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(2) the Secretary of Higher Education, or the Secretary’s designee;
(3) one representative of the University of Maryland School of Dental
Hygiene, designated by the Dean of the School;
(4) one representative of the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future
Accountability and Implementation Board, designated by the Chair of the Board;
(5) one representative of the Maryland Commission for Women, designated
by the Chair of the Commission;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0492*

SENATE BILL 492
(6) two representatives of the Maryland Association of Community
Colleges, including a representative of a rural community college with a dental hygiene
program, designated by the Executive Director of the Association;
(7) one representative of the Maryland Dental Hygienists’ Association,
designated by the President of the Association;
(8) one representative of the Maryland Dental Action Coalition, designated
by the Chief Executive Officer of the Coalition;
(9) one representative of the Maryland Rural Health Association,
designated by the President of the Association;
(10) one representative of the Maryland State Dental Association,
designated by the President of the Association;
(11) one representative of the Jon C. Burr Foundation, designated by the
President of the Foundation;
(12) one representative of the Job Opportunities Task Force, designated by
the President of the Task Force; and
(13) the following members, appointed by the Secretary of Health:
(i) a representative from a school of public health who has expertise
in workforce development;
(ii) a representative with expertise in education and training for
dental assistants;
(iii) a representative with expertise in education and training for
community health workers;
(iv) a representative with expertise in stackable credentials in
nursing education;
(v) a representative of a federally qualified health center; and
(vi) a representative from an area health education center.
(d) The Commission may consult with individuals and organizations with
expertise in oral health who are represented on the Commission.
(e) The Secretary of Health shall designate the chair of the Commission.
(f) The Maryland Department of Health shall provide staff for the Commission.

SENATE BILL 492 3
(g) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(h) The Commission shall:
(1) assess the dental hygienist shortage in the State and the impact of the
shortage on oral health in rural, suburban, and urban communities; and
(2) study and make recommendations regarding methods to:
(i) improve the recruitment and retention of dental hygienists in
private practice, community health centers, and public health settings at the statewide
level;
(ii) develop region–specific recruitment and retention strategies for
dental hygienists in rural, suburban, and urban areas of the State;
(iii) expand dental hygiene education opportunities at institutions of
higher education;
(iv) increase retention of dental hygiene students through
educational support and wraparound services; and
(v) support dental assistants and community health workers in
accessing dental hygiene educational opportunities.
(i) (1) On or before December 1, 2025, the Commission shall submit an interim
report of its findings and recommendations to the Maryland Department of Health, the
Maryland Higher Education Commission, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
(2) On or before December 1, 2026, the Commission shall submit a final
report on its findings and recommendations to the Maryland Department of Health, the
Maryland Higher Education Commission, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.